Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2402
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Juvenile Services Act:

(1) Coalition means the Nebraska Coalition for Juvenile Justice
established pursuant to section 43-2411;

(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice;

(3) Commission Grant Program means grants provided to eligible
applicants under section 43-2406;

(4) Community-based Juvenile Services
Aid Program means aid to counties and
federally recognized or state-recognized Indian tribes provided
under section 43-2404.02;

(5) Eligible applicant means a community-based agency or
organization, political subdivision, school district, federally recognized
or state-recognized Indian tribe, or state agency necessary to comply with
the federal act;

(6) Federal act means the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency
Prevention Act of 1974, 42 U.S.C. 5601 et seq., as the act existed on January 1, 2013;

(7) Juvenile means a person who is under eighteen years of
age; and

(8) Office of Juvenile Services means the Office of Juvenile
Services created in section 43-404.

Laws 1990, LB 663, § 2;

Laws 1992, LB 447, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 1167, § 41;

Laws 2001, LB 640, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB561, § 45.